Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.045

Abused victim—Reduction in sentence for murder of abuser—Petition for review.

(1) An inmate convicted of murder may petition the indeterminate sentence review board to review the inmate's sentence if the petition alleges the following:

(a) The inmate was sentenced for a murder committed prior to July 23, 1989, which was the effective date of section 1, chapter 408, Laws of 1989, as codified in RCW 9.94A.535(1)(h). RCW 9.94A.535(1)(h) provides that the sentencing court may consider as a mitigating factor evidence that the defendant or the defendant's children suffered a continuing pattern of physical or sexual abuse by the victim of the offense and the offense was a response to that abuse;

(b) RCW 9.94A.535(1)(h), if effective when the defendant committed the crime, would have provided a basis for the defendant to seek a mitigated sentence; and

(c) The sentencing court when determining what sentence to impose, did not consider evidence that the victim subjected the defendant or the defendant's children to a continuing pattern of sexual or physical abuse and the murder was in response to that abuse.

(2) An inmate who seeks to have his or her sentence reviewed under this section must petition the board for review no later than October 1, 1993. The petition may be by letter requesting review.

(3)(a) If the inmate was convicted of a murder committed prior to July 1, 1984, and the inmate is under the jurisdiction of the indeterminate sentence review board, the board shall conduct the review as provided in RCW 9.95.047. If the inmate was sentenced pursuant to chapter 9.94A RCW for a murder committed after June 30, 1984, but before July 23, 1989, the board shall conduct the review and may make appropriate recommendations to the sentencing court as provided in RCW 9.94A.890. The board shall complete its review of the petitions and submit recommendations to the sentencing courts or their successors by October 1, 1994.

(b) When reviewing petitions, the board shall solicit recommendations from the prosecuting attorneys of the counties where the petitioners were convicted, and shall accept input from other interested parties.

[ 1993 c 144 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 144: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 30, 1993]." [ 1993 c 144 s 7.]